Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.230

Exemptions.

The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the operation of the provisions of this chapter:

(1) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery by an individual employed by the government of the United States while the individual is engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States;

(2) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery by students enrolled in a school approved by the board. The performance of services must be pursuant to a course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the supervision of the instructor;

(3) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery by licensed podiatric physicians and surgeons of other states or countries while appearing at educational seminars;

(4) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiograms or similar records of the feet or portions thereof, under the supervision of a licensed podiatric physician and surgeon or a physician;

(5) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery by externs, interns, and residents in training programs approved by the American Podiatric Medical Association;

(6) The performing of podiatric services by persons not licensed under this chapter when performed under the supervision of a licensed podiatrist if those services are authorized by board rule or other law to be so performed;

(7) The treatment of ailments of the feet by physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, or other licensed health professionals practicing within the scope of their licenses;

(8) The domestic administration of family remedies or treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious denomination.

[ 1990 c 147 s 17; 1982 c 21 s 19; 1973 c 77 s 19; 1955 c 149 s 12.]